New Jersey, session 221, A323.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1987, c.20 (C.39:3-9a) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Each drivers license issued pursuant to R.S.39:3-10 shall have the legal name of the licensee endorsed thereon in [his] the licensees own handwriting. For purposes of this section, legal name shall mean the name recorded on a: (1)   birth certificate [unless otherwise changed by] ; (2)   marriage [,] certificate; (3)   social security card; (4)   divorce decree; or (5)   order of court. The [director may] chief administrator shall require that only the legal name be recorded on the drivers license.  A person who has been issued a drivers license pursuant to R.S.39:3-10 whose legal name is changed due to marriage, divorce, or by order of court shall notify the [director] chief administrator of the change in legal name within [two weeks] six months after the change is made or upon the next renewal of the driver license, whichever date is sooner. A person who fails to notify the [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles] chief administrator of a change in legal name as required in this section shall be subject to a fine.  A person who is fined under this section for a violation of this section shall not be subject to a surcharge under the [New Jersey Merit Rating Plan] Motor Vehicle Violations Surcharge System as provided in section 6 of P.L.1983, c.65 (C.17:29A-35). For the purposes of this section, a digitized signature image shall constitute a licensees signature in [his] the licensees own handwriting. A digitized signature image is an electronic representation of a persons written signature. (cf: P.L.1999, c.28, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.